Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7112
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgates rules and regulations to carry out the Managed Care Plan Network Adequacy Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 50.